Missouri, session 2026, HB2385.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 389, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto four new sections, to
be known as sections 389.611, 389.1100, 389.1200, and 389.1220, to read as follows:
389.611. 1. No railroad train shall prevent the use of a public roadway or
highway crossing for more than fifteen consecutive minutes, except when:
(1) Such train is continuously moving; or
(2) The train is stopped due to an emergency, mechanical failure, or a situation
beyond the control of the railroad operator that prevents safe movement.
2. Each instance of a violation shall constitute a separate offense for each
blocked crossing.
3. A railroad found in violation of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty
not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars per violation, to be enforced by the
department of transportation.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with or preempt federal
railroad safety regulations.
389.1100. 1. No railroad operating within this state shall operate, or permit to be
operated, any train exceeding eight thousand five hundred feet in total length on any
main track or branch line.
2. The department of transportation shall have authority to adopt rules and
standards to implement and enforce this section, including procedures for
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2385 2
measurement, exemptions for specific routes, and penalties for violations. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
invalid and void.
389.1200. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Crew member", an employee of the railroad carrier involved in the
operation of a railroad train or light engine. The term does not include hostler service,
helper service, or utility employees or contractors;
(2) "Helper service", the use of one or more locomotives to assist another train
experiencing mechanical failure or lacking sufficient power to traverse difficult terrain,
including travel to and from the point of assistance;
(3) "Hostler service", the movement of locomotives not attached to rail cars
within a rail yard.
2. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section, a railroad train or light
engine used in connection with the movement of freight shall be operated by a crew
consisting of not fewer than two qualified crew members.
3. The two-person crew requirement shall not apply to:
(1) Helper services;
(2) Hostler services; or
(3) The movement of a train for the purpose of loading or unloading freight,
provided the train is operated at a speed not exceeding ten miles per hour.
4. Any person or railroad carrier who willfully violates subsection 2 of this
section shall be subject to the following penalties:
(1) For a first offense, a fine not to exceed one-thousand five hundred dollars;
(2) For a second offense, a fine not to exceed five-thousand dollars;
(3) For a third or subsequent offense, a fine not to exceed ten-thousand dollars.
5. This section shall not be construed to conflict with federal regulations
governing railroad crew staffing.
6. The department of transportation shall have authority to enforce this section
and may promulgate rules to carry out its provisions. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the

HB 2385 3
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
7. The enactment of this section shall become effective only upon notification to
the revisor of statutes by the attorney general of Missouri that a final judgment that
affirms the validity of the Federal Railroad Administration's two-person crew rule has
been entered.
389.1220. 1. For purposes of this section, "personally identifying information"
includes a crew member's or engineer's name, home address, personal telephone
number, driver's license number, social security number, or other information that
could reasonably be used to identify or locate such individual.
2. Personally identifying information of train crew members and engineers
contained in reports or communications related to railroad incidents involving motor
vehicles shall be redacted from any publicly released records.
3. Unredacted copies of such records shall be accessible only:
(1) To the employing railroad or its authorized representatives;
(2) By court order, and to others specifically authorized by such order; or
(3) To law enforcement agencies, the attorney general's office, or the department
of transportation if the information is necessary to perform their official duties.
4. If a court determines that a crew member or engineer was not at fault in a
railroad incident involving a motor vehicle, such person's identifying information shall
remain confidential in all public records.
5. The department of transportation shall enforce this section and may
promulgate rules to ensure compliance and confidentiality. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔